District of Columbia statutes.
19-1503

Scope.

This chapter applies to disclaimers of any interest in or power over property, whenever created.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-205, § 2(b), 53 DCR 9063
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 3 of the Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act (1999).